Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7644.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 9-29-1, 9-29-18 and 9-29-19 of the General Laws in Chapter 9-29
entitled "Fees" are hereby amended to read as follows:
9-29-1. District court fees.
(a) Every district court shall be allowed the following fees, in full, to be taxed in the bill of
costs in every civil action:
(1) For the entry of every small claim ......................................................... $55.00 75.00.
(2) For the entry of every other action ......................................................... $80.00 100.00.
(3) For every writ of execution ...................................................................... $20.00 40.00.
(b) In addition to the fees set forth herein, the district court shall apply a technology
surcharge assessed in accordance with § 8-15-11.
(c) Provided, that five dollars ($5.00) twenty dollars ($20.00) of the fee for the entry of
every action in subdivision (a)(1) or (a)(2) or writ in subdivision (a)(3) shall be forwarded to Rhode
Island Legal Services.
9-29-18. Superior court fees.
(a) The superior court shall be allowed the following fees in full to be taxed in the bill of
costs in every civil action:
(1) For entry of every civil action or petition ........................................... $160.00 180.00.
(2) For every writ of execution .................................................................... $50.00 70.00.
(3) For the issuance of every citation ........................................................... $25.00 40.00.

(b) In addition to the fees set forth in subsection (a) of this section, the superior court shall
apply a technology surcharge on all filing fees assessed in accordance with § 8-15-11.
(c) Provided, that ten dollars ($10.00) twenty dollars ($20.00) of the fee for the entry of
every civil action or petition shall be forwarded to Rhode Island Legal Services.
9-29-19. Family court fees.
(a) The family court shall be allowed the following fees in full to be taxed in the bill of
costs in every domestic relations or other civil proceeding:
(1) For the entry of every petition, complaint, or action .......................... $120.00 130.00.
(2) For every writ of execution .................................................................... $40.00 50.00.
(b) In addition to the fees as set forth herein, the family court shall apply a technology
surcharge fee assessed in accordance with § 8-15-11.
(c) Provided, ten dollars ($10.00) twenty dollars ($20.00) of the fee for the entry of every
petition, complaint or action shall be forwarded to Rhode Island Legal Services.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005055
========
LC005055 - Page 2 of 3